Washington statutes.
RCW 15.145.030

University's primary responsibilities.

[(1)] The university has primary responsibility for the following components of the soil health initiative:

(1) [(a)] Establishing a regionally dispersed network of long-term agroecological research and extension demonstration sites to showcase and refine soil health research and practices, build statewide awareness and understanding, and support technical assistance capacity through trainings and on-farm demonstration projects that promote positive soil health outcomes across the state's diverse food production zones;

(2) [(b)] Compiling existing information and developing new information on nutrition effects related to agricultural soil management practices and regimes, and identifying data gaps associated with understanding and quantifying such effects across the state's diverse food production zones, soil types, tillage systems, and cropping methods. Nutrition effects information compiled, developed, and assessed must include, but not be limited to, soil, plant, and food nutrient and micronutrient levels and community access to nutritious food;

(3) [(c)] Developing a statewide soil health road map, based on a compilation of existing soil health information and ancillary agronomic, economic, environmental, and nutritional benefits and identified data gaps, to refine metrics and objectives to guide future public and private investment in the soil health initiative;

(4) [(d)] Developing a statewide agricultural soil health monitoring system and database to receive data, test modeling estimations, and measure, analyze, and track trends over time in the productive use, management, and health of Washington's agricultural soils; and

(5) [(e)] Consulting and collaborating with the department and the commission to support all soil health initiative goals, objectives, and components established in this chapter.

(6) [(2)] The university shall perform its responsibilities within the appropriations provided for the soil health initiative.

[ 2020 c 314 s 4.]